Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB317.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 635.11. Coverage for Eating Disorder Treatment.--(a) All health insurance policies shall provide coverage for treatment of eating disorders, which shall include inpatient hospitalization, partial hospitalization, residential treatment, intensive outpatient treatment, follow up outpatient care, counseling, medical nutrition therapy and nutrition therapy 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 services provided by a licensed treating physician, psychologist, psychiatrist, professional counselor, clinical social worker, marriage and family therapist or licensed dietitian-nutritionist in accordance with a treatment plan. Medical necessity determinations and care management for the treatment of eating disorders:(1) shall consider the overall medical and mental health needs of the individual with an eating disorder;(2) may not be based solely on weight; and(3) shall take into consideration the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, Fifth Edition (DSM-5)for the treatment of patients with eating disorders and the current standards based upon the medical literature generally recognized as authoritative in the medical community.(b) A health insurance policy and an insurer may not: (1) deny to an individual eligibility, or continued eligibility, to enroll or to renew coverage under the terms of the health insurance policy solely for the purpose of avoiding the requirement of this section;(2) provide monetary payments, rebates or other benefits to an individual to encourage the individual to accept less than the minimum protections available under this section;(3) penalize or otherwise reduce or limit the reimbursement of a provider because the provider provided care to an individual participant or beneficiary in accordance with this section;(4) provide incentives, monetary or otherwise, to a provider to induce the provider to provide care to an individual participant or beneficiary in a manner inconsistent with this section; or20250SB0317PN0251 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) deny to an individual participant or beneficiary continued eligibility to enroll or to renew coverage under the terms of the policy solely because the individual was previously found to have an eating disorder or to have received treatment for an eating disorder.(c) Nothing in this section may be construed as preventing a health insurance policy from imposing deductibles, coinsurance or other cost-sharing in relation to treatment for eating disorders, except that the deductibles, coinsurance or other cost-sharing may not be greater than the deductibles, coinsurance or other cost-sharing imposed on other comparable coverages for medical or surgical services under the policy.(d) The following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Clinical social worker." A licensed clinical social worker as defined in section 3 of the act of July 9, 1987 (P.L.220, No.39), known as the "Social Workers, Marriage and Family Therapists and Professional Counselors Act.""Eating disorder." Anorexia nervosa, bulimia nervosa, avoidant/restrictive food intake disorder, binge-eating disorder, pica, rumination disorder and other specified feeding or eating disorders."Health insurance policy." As follows:(1) An individual or group health, sickness or accident policy, subscriber contract or certificate offered, issued or renewed by an entity subject to one of the following:(i) This act. (ii) The act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), known as the "Health Maintenance Organization Act."20250SB0317PN0251 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to hospital plan corporations) or 63 (relating to professional health services plan corporations).(2) The term does not include accident only, fixed indemnity, limited benefit, credit, dental, vision, specified disease, Medicare supplement, Civilian Health and Medical Program of the Uniformed Services (CHAMPUS) supplement, long-term care or disability income, workers' compensation or automobile medical payment insurance."Individual health insurance policy." A policy, subscriber contract, certificate or plan issued by an insurer that provides medical or health care coverage on an annual basis to an individual other than in connection with a group insurance plan."Insurer." An entity offering a health insurance policy."Licensed dietitian-nutritionist." As defined in section 2 of the act of May 22, 1951 (P.L.317, No.69), known as "The Professional Nursing Law.""Marriage and family therapist." A licensed marriage and family therapist as defined in section 3 of the "Social Workers, Marriage and Family Therapists and Professional Counselors Act.""Medical nutrition therapy." As defined in section 2 of "The Professional Nursing Law.""Nutrition therapy services." As defined in section 2 of "The Professional Nursing Law.""Physician." As defined in section 2 of the act of December 20, 1985 (P.L.457, No.112), known as the "Medical Practice Act of 1985.""Professional counselor." A licensed professional counselor as defined in section 3 of the "Social Workers, Marriage and Family Therapists and Professional Counselors Act."20250SB0317PN0251 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Psychiatrist." As defined in section 102 of the act of October 20, 1966 (3rd Sp.Sess., P.L.96, No.6), known as the "Mental Health and Intellectual Disability Act of 1966.""Psychologist." A person licensed to practice psychology under the act of March 23, 1972 (P.L.136, No.52), known as the "Professional Psychologists Practice Act."Section 2. The addition of section 635.11 of the act applies as follows:(1) For health insurance policies for which either rates or forms are required to be filed with the Insurance Department or the Federal Government, section 635.11 of the act shall apply to any such policy for which a form or rate is first filed on or after the effective date of this section.(2) For health insurance policies for which neither rates nor forms are required to be filed with the Insurance Department or the Federal Government, section 635.11 of the act shall apply to any such policy issued or renewed on or after 180 days after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0317PN0251 - 5 - 1234567891011121314151617181920